Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4368.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2843. (1) A funeral director who first assumes custody of a dead body, either personally or through his or her the funeral director's authorized agent, shall report the death. For purposes of this subsection, "dead body" includes, but is not limited to, the body of an infant who survived an attempted abortion as described in the born alive infant protection act, 2002 PA 687, MCL 333.1071 to 333.1073, and who later died. The funeral director or the authorized agent shall must obtain the necessary personal data from the next of kin or the best qualified individual or source available and shall must obtain medical certification as follows: (a) If the death occurred outside an institution, the medical certification portion of the death record shall must be completed and certified not later than 48 hours after death by the attending physician; or in the absence of the attending physician, by a physician acting as the attending physician's authorized representative; or in the absence of an authorized representative, by the county medical examiner; or in the absence of the county medical examiner, by the county health officer or the deputy county medical examiner. If the death occurred in an institution, the medical certification shall must be completed and signed not later than 48 hours after death by the attending physician; or in the absence of the attending physician, by a physician acting as the attending physician's authorized representative; or in the absence of an authorized representative, by the chief medical officer of the institution in which death occurred, after reviewing pertinent records and making other investigation as considered necessary, or by a pathologist. (b) A physician described in subdivision (a), who for himself or herself the physician or as an agent or employee of another individual neglects or refuses to certify a death record properly presented to him or her the physician for certification by a funeral director or who refuses or neglects to furnish information in his or her the physician's possession , is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 60 days , or a fine of not less than $25.00 nor or more than $100.00, or both. (2) A physician described in subsection (1)(a) shall provide the medical certification described in subsection (1)(a) within 48 hours after the death. (3) A death record shall must be certified by a funeral director who is licensed under article 18 of the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 339.1801 to 339.1812, or by an individual who holds a courtesy license under section 1806a of that act, the occupational code, 1980 PA 299, MCL 339.1806a, and shall must be filed with the local registrar of the district where the death occurred within 72 hours after the death. (4) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the death of an infant who was born alive following an attempted abortion and was surrendered to an emergency service provider or a newborn safety device under the safe delivery of newborns law, sections 1 to 20 of chapter XII of the probate code of 1939, 1939 PA 288, MCL 712.1 to 712.20, and then died shall must be reported in the same manner as for any death. However, the The deceased infant shall be listed as "Baby Doe" and no information that would directly identify the deceased infant or the deceased infant's parents shall must be reported, including, but not limited to, the following information: (a) The name of the mother or father. (b) The address of the mother or father. (c) The name of the informant. (d) The address of the informant. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 4067 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.